Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5758.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 66 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 21 the following section:-
Section 22. Each police department in the commonwealth shall appoint a designated
officer, within said department, with trauma and mental health experience, to coordinate with the
families of homicide victims with quarterly reports on the open investigations related to their
family member.
The quarterly reports shall include the progress of the police investigation into the
homicide and list all available state and local resources for grief counseling and mental health
services, a review of police procedures used during the investigation, and efforts to maintain the
privacy, cultural and spiritual needs of the victim’s family in accordance with chapter 66A of the
General Laws.
of 2

The designated officer shall serve as a liaison between family rights groups and state and
local agencies with the capacity to provide services to homicide victim’s families.
SECTION 2. This act shall be known as the Darrell Lee Jenkins Jr. Memorial Act.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
of 2